Indiana, session 2026, SB292.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-20.3-18 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2025 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 18. (a) If
the distressed unit appeal board delays or suspends, for a period
determined by the board, any payments on loans or advances from
the common school fund under section 6.8 of this chapter, the
distressed unit appeal board may recommend to the state board of
finance that the term of the loans or advances be extended. If the
distressed unit appeal board makes a recommendation to extend
the term of the loans or advances, the state board of finance may
extend the term of the loans or advances for a period of time that
is equal to or less than the number of months for which the
payments are delayed or suspended.
(b) If payments on loans or advances from the common school
fund are suspended under section 6.8 of this chapter, the distressed
unit appeal board shall require that the school corporation:
(1) establish a school improvement fund; and
2026 IN 292—LS 6952/DI 120


(2) transfer to the school improvement fund an amount equal
to the payments that are delayed or suspended for calendar
year 2020.
(c) A school improvement fund established under subsection
(b)(1) may be used only for the following purposes:
(1) Repair, renovation, or other improvements to school
buildings and property being used for education purposes as
of July 1, 2020.
(2) Demolition of school buildings or other structures on
school property in existence as of July 1, 2020.
(d) All expenditures from a school improvement fund
established under subsection (b)(1) must be approved by the
distressed unit appeal board.
(e) A school corporation may, on an annual basis, levy a tax in
the debt service fund equal to the amount that would have been
deducted from the distribution of state tuition support for the
payment of loans made under section 6.8 of this chapter during
calendar year 2020 if the loans had not been suspended. The
amount received from a tax under this subsection must be
transferred from the debt service fund to the education fund.
(f) With the approval of the distressed unit appeal board, a
school corporation may spend other funds of the school
corporation for the purposes described in subsection (c) and
reimburse the expenditures from a school improvement fund
established under subsection (b)(1).
(g) This section expires January 1, 2028.
SECTION 2. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 292—LS 6952/DI 120